Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-316
Respondent, defined.

Respondent shall mean:

(1) The person or other entity accused in a complaint of a discriminatory housing practice; and

(2) Any other person or entity identified in the course of investigation and notified as required with respect to respondents so identified under section 20-326.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 17.